District of Columbia statutes.
10-1501

Approval of Draft Master Plan.

Pursuant to the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 2002 (Public Law 107-96), the Mayor transmitted to the Council a Draft Master Plan for Public Reservation 13, dated March 31, 2002. Public Law 107-96 provides that the Mayor shall present to the Council for its approval a plan for the development of Reservation 13. The Draft Master Plan for Public Reservation 13, dated March 31, 2002, is hereby approved.

Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-300, § 2, 50 DCR 406
For tax exemption of property, see § 47-1055.

Exchange of Title over Reservation 13

For the exchange of title over Reservation 13, see Public Law 109-396, 120 Stat. 2711.